Wyoming, session 2026, HB0136.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-201(b)(intro), (iii) and by
creating a new paragraph (v) and (d) is amended to read:

11-25-201. Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports;
disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.

(b) Every Wednesday following any pari-mutuel event,
the permittee shall complete all of the following:

HB0136

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0475
(iii) Pay an amount equal to one percent (1%) of
the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events, shown by the report to the commission,
to be transferred by the commission to the county and the
city or town in which the permittee is located, in equal
shares, or to the county alone if the permittee is not
located within the boundaries of a city or town. The
county, city or town receiving an amount under this
paragraph may credit that amount to the state fair account
upon a majority vote of the county's, city's or town's
governing body; and

(v) Pay an amount equal to one percent (1%) of
the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events and simulcasting, shown by the report to
the commission, to be credited to the state highway fund.

(d) All sums paid to the commission under this act
except contributions from permittees to the breeder award
fund, amounts paid under paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv)
through (v) of this section, and fines and penalties shall
be credited to the pari-mutuel account which shall be used
by the commission for the payment of all expenses incurred
HB0136

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0475
in enforcing this act. On a quarterly basis, the commission
shall transfer amounts within the account in excess of one
million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) to
the state treasurer for credit to the legislative
stabilization reserve account. All fines and penalties
collected under this act shall be paid to the state
treasurer and credited as provided in W.S. 8-1-109. The
state treasurer shall pay out of the account all warrants
drawn by the state auditor, upon vouchers issued and signed
by the president, vice-president or executive secretary of
the commission. The commission shall keep an accurate and
true account of all funds received and all vouchers issued
by the commission. All funds received and all vouchers
issued by the commission shall be audited at least
biennially by the director of the state department of audit
or his designee and a copy of the audit shall be delivered
within thirty (30) days after completion to the governor
and the commission. The costs of the audit shall be borne
by the commission. The members of the commission shall
receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S.
33-1-302(a)(vii), and compensation of fifty dollars
($50.00) for each day during which they are actually
engaged in the discharge of their duties. The total
HB0136

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0475
expenses incurred by the commission shall not exceed the
total amount in the pari-mutuel account.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0136